Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,135
Student; right to amount withheld.

Any amounts withheld or obtained from a student by a college or university in violation of sections 85-9,133 to 85-9,139 shall be turned over to such student in accordance with section 85-9,136.

Laws 1991, LB 69, § 3.